Illinois, session 104th, SB3767.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Early Childhood Act is 5amended by adding Section 1-40 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 3/1-40 new)7    Sec. 1-40. Early Childhood Community Organization Grant 8Program.9    (a) Subject to appropriation, the Department of Early 10Childhood shall establish and administer a competitive grant 11program to support the development or enhancement of nonprofit 12organizations or community-based organizations providing early 13childhood resources or services.14    (b) Early Childhood Community Organization Grant Program 15funds shall be made available to each eligible entity upon 16completion of an application process that is consistent with 17rules established by the Department of Early Childhood. The 18application shall include:19        (1) the planned use of the funds;20        (2) identification of need for the funds that is 21    supported by local, regional, and state data;22        (3) a plan for long-term sustainability; and23        (4) a long-term plan for continuous improvement.  SB3767- 2 -LRB104 20037 KTG 33488 b1    (c) The Department of Early Childhood shall adopt rules as 2may be necessary to implement the provisions of this Section, 3including, but not limited to, rules on the identification of 4additional prioritization areas for each competitive grant 5application cycle that are within the scope of the authorized 6uses. Priority consideration for all applications shall be 7given for proposals that intend to serve a majority of 8families with racial or ethnic identities that are 9underrepresented in the early childhood system.